District of Columbia statutes.
8-101.11

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“Best available control technology” or “BACT” means the pollution control standard as determined by the Director consistent with, but no less stringent than, 42 U.S.C. §  7479(3).

(2)

“Demand response generating source” means a stationary generator subject to an agreement or obligation to provide power in response to power grid needs, economic signals from competitive wholesale electric markets, or special retail rates. The term “demand response generating source” shall not include a generator that derives its energy from an energy source that qualifies as a tier one renewable source under Chapter 14A of Title 34 [§  34-1431 et seq.].

(3)

“Director” means the Director of the District Department of the Environment.

History

Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 201, 61 DCR 6767